District of Columbia statutes.
44-1711

Registered solicitor’s use of name of other person; publication of names of contributors.

(a)

No person who is required to obtain a certificate of registration under this chapter shall, for the purpose of soliciting contributions, use the name of any other person, except that of an officer, director, or trustee of the organization for which contributions are solicited, without the written consent of such other person.

(b)

A person shall be deemed to have used the name of another person for the purpose of soliciting contributions if such latter person’s name is listed on any stationery, advertisement, brochure, or correspondence in or by which a contribution is solicited by or on behalf of a charitable organization or his name is listed or referred to in connection with a request for a contribution as one who has contributed to, sponsored, or endorsed the charitable organization or its activities.

(c)

Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the publication of names of contributors without their written consents, in an annual or other periodic report issued by a charitable organization for the purpose of reporting on its operations and affairs to its membership or for the purpose of reporting contributions to contributors.

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 281, Pub. L. 85-87, § 12
1981 Ed., § 2-711.
1973 Ed., § 2-2111.